Illinois, session 104th, HB3244.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-80 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-80 new)7    Sec. 10-80. Audit on taxpayer funded abortions. The 8Auditor General shall conduct a post audit of all accounts and 9transactions of the Department of Human Services to determine 10the total amount in public funds the Department has expended 11since January 1, 2018 (the effective date of Public Act 12100-538) to cover the costs of elective abortions and related 13services. Department expenditures subject to examination under 14the audit include:15        (1) any grant amounts awarded to nonprofit agencies 16    and organizations in accordance with the Problem Pregnancy 17    Health Services and Care Act to cover the costs of 18    elective abortions and related services; and 19        (2) any funds used to cover the costs of elective 20    abortions and related services provided under the Medical 21    Assistance Program under Article V of the Illinois Public 22    Aid Code. 23    The Auditor General may request the cooperation of the   HB3244- 2 -LRB104 10564 KTG 20640 b1Department of Healthcare and Family Services to assist in 2obtaining any information needed to complete the post audit. 3Upon completion of the audit, the Auditor General shall issue 4a report in accordance with Section 3-14 of the Illinois State 5Auditing Act. Such report shall be posted on the official 6website of the Department of Human Services.  7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.